Tennessee, session 114, SB1540.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-247(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (46).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-252(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) State Alzheimer's disease and related dementia advisory council, created by
§ 68-1-148;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1540
010098
- 1 -